Mississippi, session 2026, SB2335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-9-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-9-7.  (1)  Every person who commits, attempts to commit, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of, any act declared in Chapter 3, 5, or 7 of this title, to be a crime, whether individually or in connection with one or more other persons or as a principal, agent, or accessory, shall be guilty of such offense.  Every person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly, or * * * wilfully willfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, permits, or directs another to violate any provision of said chapter is likewise guilty of such offense. (2)  (a)  A moving violation under this title, against a holder of a commercial driver's license who is operating a vehicle that does not require the possession of a commercial driver's license to operate at the time of the violation, shall be treated as if the moving violation were against a person who held only a regular driver's license under Section 63-1-47. (b)  A moving violation under this title, against a holder of a commercial driver's license where the box on the State of Mississippi Uniform Traffic Ticket that would indicate that the violation was pursuant to the Commercial Driver's License Law is not marked or designated, shall be treated as if the moving violation were against a person who held only a regular driver's license under Section 63-1-47. (c)  Paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not apply to any moving violation under Chapter 11, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.